Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE E. JURIES

CHAPTER 62. PETIT JURIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 62.001. JURY SOURCE; RECONSTITUTION OF JURY WHEEL. (a) The jury wheel must be reconstituted by using, as the source:

(1) the names of all persons on the current voter registration lists from all the precincts in the county; and

(2) all names on a current list to be furnished by the Department of Public Safety, showing the citizens of the county who:

(A) hold a valid Texas driver's license or a valid personal identification card or certificate issued by the department; and

(B) are not disqualified from jury service under Section 62.102(1), (2), or (8).

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the names of persons listed on a register of persons exempt from jury service may not be placed in the jury wheel, as provided by Sections 62.108, 62.109, 62.113, 62.114, and 62.115.

(c) Each year not later than the third Tuesday in November or the date provided by Section 16.032, Election Code, for the cancellation of voter registrations, whichever is earlier, the voter registrar of each county shall furnish to the secretary of state a current voter registration list from all the precincts in the county that, except as provided by Subsection (d), includes:

(1) the complete name, mailing address, date of birth, voter registration number, and precinct number for each voter;

(2) if available, the Texas driver's license number or personal identification card or certificate number and social security number for each voter; and

(3) any other information included on the voter registration list of the county.

(d) The list required by Subsection (a)(1) must exclude the names of persons on the suspense list maintained under Section 15.081, Election Code.

(e) The voter registrar shall send a list of the names of persons excluded to the secretary of state with the list required by Subsection (c).

(f) The Department of Public Safety shall furnish a list to the secretary of state that shows the names required under Subsection (a)(2) and that contains any of the information enumerated in Subsection (c) that is available to the department, including citizenship status and county of residence. The list shall exclude the names of convicted felons, persons who are not citizens of the United States, persons residing outside the county, and the duplicate name of any registrant. The department shall furnish the list to the secretary of state on or before the first Monday in October of each year.

(g) The secretary of state shall accept the lists furnished as provided by Subsections (c) through (f). The secretary of state shall combine the lists, eliminate duplicate names, and send the combined list to each county on or before December 31 of each year or as may be required under a plan developed in accordance with Section 62.011. The district clerk or bailiff designated as the officer in charge of the jury selection process for a county that has adopted a plan under Section 62.011 shall give the secretary of state notice not later than the 90th day before the date the list is required. The list furnished the county must be in a format, electronic or printed copy, as requested by the county and must be certified by the secretary of state stating that the list contains the names required by Subsections (c) through (f), eliminating duplications. The secretary of state shall furnish the list free of charge.

(h) If the secretary of state is unable to furnish the list as provided in this section because of the failure of the voter registrar to furnish the county voter registration list to the secretary of state, the county tax assessor-collector, sheriff, county clerk, and district clerk in the county shall meet at the county courthouse between January 1 and January 15 of the following year and shall reconstitute the jury wheel for the county, except as provided under a plan adopted under Section 62.011. The deadlines included in the plan control for preparing the list and reconstituting the wheel. The secretary of state shall send the list furnished by the Department of Public Safety as provided by Subsection (f) to the voter registrar, who shall combine the lists as described in this section for use as the juror source and certify the combined list as required of the secretary of state under Subsection (g).

(i) The commissioners court may, instead of using the method provided by Subsections (c) through (h), contract with another governmental unit or a private person to combine the voter registration list with the list furnished by the Department of Public Safety. Subsections (c) through (h) do not apply to a county in which the commissioners court has contracted with another governmental unit or a private person under this subsection. The Department of Public Safety may not charge a fee for furnishing a list under this subsection. Each list must contain the name, date of birth, address, county of residence, and citizenship status of each person listed. If practical, each list must contain any other information useful in determining if the person is qualified to serve as a juror.

(j) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), in a county with a population of 250,000 or more, the names of persons who are summoned for jury service in the county and who appear for service must be removed from the jury wheel and may not be maintained in the jury wheel until the third anniversary of the date the person appeared for service or until the next date the jury wheel is reconstituted, whichever date occurs earlier. This subsection applies regardless of whether the person served on a jury as a result of the summons.

(k) In reconstituting the jury wheel, the county or district clerk shall update jury wheel cards to reflect addresses that have been changed as provided by Section 62.0146.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 789, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 425, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 571, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 609 (S.B. 681), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 250 (H.B. 1103), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.004, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.002. JURY WHEEL CARDS. (a) The officials or their deputies who reconstitute the jury wheel shall write on a separate jury wheel card of uniform size and color the name and, if possible, the post office address of each prospective juror that resides in the county and whose name appears on the current lists used under Section 62.001. The name of each prospective juror may appear on only one card.

(b) In a county with a population of 140,000 or more, the commissioners court shall employ typists who shall type the names and addresses of qualified prospective jurors on separate jury wheel cards of uniform size and color under the direction and control of the district clerk. The expenses incurred in typing the names and addresses must be authorized, reported, and paid and accounted for under the laws and rules that govern the payment of other expenses of the office of district clerk. The compensation of the typists and the expenses are paid from the jury fund.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 62.003. CONSTRUCTION AND SECURITY OF JURY WHEEL. (a) The commissioners court shall provide a jury wheel in which to deposit the jury wheel cards.

(b) The jury wheel must revolve freely on its axle and be constructed of a durable material. The jury wheel may be equipped with a motor capable of revolving the wheel in a manner that thoroughly mixes the jury wheel cards.

(c) At all times that it is not in use as provided by this subchapter, the jury wheel shall be locked by using two separate locks. The key to one lock may not open the other lock. The clasps attached to the jury wheel onto which the two locks are fitted must be arranged so that the jury wheel may be opened only if the two locks are unlocked at the same time. The sheriff shall keep the key to one lock. The district clerk shall keep the key to the other lock.

(d) The sheriff and the district clerk may not open the jury wheel or permit it to be opened except at a time and in a manner authorized by this subchapter, or permit another person to open the wheel if the person is not authorized by this subchapter to open the wheel.

(e) The sheriff and the district clerk shall keep the jury wheel, when not in use, in a safe place with security that prevents anyone from tampering with the jury wheel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.004. DRAWING NAMES FOR JURY LISTS. (a) The county clerk and the sheriff of the county shall draw the names of the prospective jurors for a county court from the jury wheel in the presence and under the direction of the county judge. The district clerk and the sheriff or any constable of the county shall draw the names of the prospective jurors for a justice court, county court at law, or district court from the jury wheel in the presence and under the direction of the district judge.

(b) The county or district clerk and the sheriff or constable shall draw the names of prospective jurors from the jury wheel after the wheel has been turned to thoroughly mix the jury wheel cards and shall draw the names one by one if so directed by the judge in whose presence the names are drawn. The names of prospective jurors shall be drawn at least 10 days before the first day of the term of court.

(c) The county or district clerk and the sheriff or constable shall draw as many jury lists as are required for the term of court. They shall record the names that are drawn on as many lists as the judge in whose presence the names are drawn considers necessary to ensure an adequate number of jurors for the term.

(d) A deputy may represent the county or district clerk or the sheriff or constable at the drawing. Other persons may be present only as provided by this subchapter.

(e) An official attending the drawing may not divulge to anyone the name of a person that is drawn as a prospective juror.

(f) The names of additional prospective jurors may be drawn as needed in the manner provided by this section if it appears at any time during the term of court that the jury lists already drawn will be exhausted before the term expires.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 36, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1114 (H.B. 2414), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 62.005. OBSERVATION OF DRAWING OF NAMES. (a) On written application of a party in a case that is pending on the docket of a justice, county, or district court for which a jury is required, the party or his authorized representative may be present and observe the drawing of the names of prospective jurors from the jury wheel and the placement of the names on the jury lists for the time period in which the party's case is set for trial.

(b) The identity of the persons whose names are drawn from the jury wheel and placed on the jury lists may not be revealed to the observer.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 62.006. CERTIFICATION OF JURY LISTS. (a) The county or district clerk or the clerk's deputy who draws the names of prospective jurors and the judge in whose presence the names were drawn for placement on jury lists shall certify the jury lists to be the lists drawn for that term.

(b) Each certified jury list must be sealed in a separate envelope that is endorsed, "List No. ______ of the petit jurors drawn on the ______ day of __________, 19____, for the ______ Court of __________ County." The blanks in the endorsement on an envelope must be properly filled. The envelopes shall be consecutively numbered starting with the number one.

(c) The county or district clerk or the clerk's deputy who draws the names shall write his name across the seal of each envelope and deliver the envelopes to the judge in whose presence the names were drawn.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.007. ENVELOPES CONTAINING JURY LISTS; OATH. (a) The justice of the peace or the county or district judge receiving an envelope containing a jury list shall inspect the envelope for proper endorsement.

(b) The judge shall return the envelope to the county or district clerk or clerk's deputy on completion of his inspection and may instruct the clerk or deputy to endorse on the envelope that the jury for that week is to be summoned for a day other than Monday of that week.

(c) At the time that the judge returns the envelope to the clerk or deputy, the judge shall administer to the clerk and each of the clerk's deputies an oath that in substance provides:

"You do solemnly swear that you will not open an envelope containing a jury list now delivered to you nor permit an envelope to be opened until the time prescribed by law; and that you will not communicate to any person the names appearing on a jury list nor directly or indirectly converse or communicate with a person selected as a juror about a case pending for trial in this court at its next term, so help you God."

(d) Immediately after the judge returns an envelope containing a jury list to the clerk or deputy, the clerk shall file the envelope in a secure place in his office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 62.008. ENVELOPES CONTAINING JURY WHEEL CARDS. (a) At the time that names are drawn for jury service and placed on a jury list, the jury wheel cards containing the names on the jury list shall be sealed in a separate envelope that is endorsed, "Cards containing the names of jurors on List No. ______ of the petit jurors drawn on the ______ day of __________, 19____, for the ______ Court of __________ County." The blanks in the endorsement on an envelope shall be properly filled.

(b) The county or district clerk, as the case may be, shall retain unopened a sealed envelope containing jury wheel cards in a secure manner until the jurors selected from the jury list with names corresponding to those on the jury wheel cards in the envelope are impaneled for jury service.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.009. REUSE OF JURY WHEEL CARDS. (a) After jurors are impaneled and serve at least four days, the clerk or his deputy shall open the envelope containing the jury wheel cards with names that correspond to those on a jury list from which the impaneled jurors were selected for jury service.

(b) On opening the envelope, the clerk or his deputy shall immediately return to the jury wheel each card in the envelope with the name of a person who was not impaneled or who did not serve at least four days and shall place in a box, for use by the next officials selecting names of persons for the jury wheel, each jury wheel card in the envelope with the name of a person who served at least four days. However, the clerk or deputy opening the envelope may withhold from the jury wheel all cards selected for that jury list unless the judge orders him to return the cards to the jury wheel.

(c) If any of the jury lists drawn for a term of court are not used, the clerk or his deputy, immediately after the expiration of the term, shall open the envelopes containing the jury wheel cards with the names that appear on the unused lists and return the jury wheel cards to the jury wheel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.010. REFILLING OR REPLACEMENT OF JURY WHEEL. (a) If all the jury wheel cards have been drawn from the jury wheel, jury wheel cards shall immediately be returned to the jury wheel.

(b) If the jury wheel and its contents are lost or destroyed, the jury wheel shall immediately be replaced and jury wheel cards shall immediately be placed in the jury wheel as provided by this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.011. ELECTRONIC OR MECHANICAL METHOD OF SELECTION. (a) On the recommendation of a majority of the district and criminal district judges of a county, the commissioners court, by order entered in its minutes, may adopt a plan for the selection of names of persons for jury service with the aid of electronic or mechanical equipment instead of drawing the names from a jury wheel.

(b) A plan authorized by this section for the selection of names of prospective jurors must:

(1) be proposed in writing to the commissioners court by a majority of the district and criminal district judges of the county at a meeting of the judges called for that purpose;

(2) specify that the source of names of persons for jury service is the same as that provided by Section 62.001 and that the names of persons listed in a register of persons exempt from jury service may not be used in preparing the record of names from which a jury list is selected, as provided by Sections 62.108 and 62.109;

(3) provide a fair, impartial, and objective method of selecting names of persons for jury service with the aid of electronic or mechanical equipment;

(4) designate the district clerk, or in a county with a population of at least 1.7 million and in which more than 70 percent of the population resides in a single municipality, a bailiff appointed as provided under Section 62.019, as the officer in charge of the selection process and define the officer's duties; and

(5) provide that the method of selection either will use the same record of names for the selection of persons for jury service until that record is exhausted or will use the same record of names for a period of time specified by the plan.

(c) The provisions of this subchapter relating to the selection of names of persons for jury service by the use of a jury wheel do not apply in a county that adopts a plan authorized by this section for the selection of names of prospective jurors by the use of electronic or mechanical equipment.

(d) A state agency or the secretary of state may not charge a fee for furnishing a list of names required by Section 62.001.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 3, 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 677, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 609 (S.B. 681), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0111. COMPUTER OR TELEPHONE RESPONSE TO SUMMONS. (a) A plan authorized under Section 62.011 for the selection of names of prospective jurors may allow for a prospective juror to appear in response to a summons by:

(1) contacting the county officer responsible for summoning jurors by computer;

(2) calling an automated telephone system; or

(3) appearing before the court in person.

(b) A plan adopted under Subsection (a) may allow for a prospective juror to provide information to the county officer responsible for summoning jurors or for the county officer to provide information to the prospective juror by computer or automated telephone system, including:

(1) information that permits the court to determine whether the prospective juror is qualified for jury service under Section 62.102;

(2) information that permits the court to determine whether the prospective juror is exempt from jury service under Section 62.106;

(3) submission of a request by the prospective juror for a postponement of or excuse from jury service under Section 62.110;

(4) information for jury assignment under Section 62.016, including:

(A) the prospective juror's postponement status;

(B) if the prospective juror could potentially serve on a jury in a justice court, the residency of the prospective juror; and

(C) if the prospective juror could potentially serve on a jury in a criminal matter, whether the prospective juror has been convicted of misdemeanor theft;

(5) completion and submission by the prospective juror of the written juror questionnaire under Section 62.0132;

(6) the prospective juror's electronic mail address; and

(7) notification to the prospective juror by electronic mail of:

(A) whether the prospective juror is qualified for jury service;

(B) the status of the exemption, postponement, or judicial excuse request of the prospective juror; or

(C) whether the prospective juror has been assigned to a jury panel.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.027, eff. September 1, 2023.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 276, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.005, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.027, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.012. USE OF JURY LISTS. (a) When a justice of the peace or a county or district judge requires a jury for a particular week, the judge, within a reasonable time before the prospective jurors are summoned, shall notify the county clerk, for a county court jury, or the district clerk, for a justice or district court jury, to open the next consecutively numbered envelope containing a jury list that is in the clerk's possession and has not been opened. The judge shall also notify the clerk of the date that the prospective jurors are to be summoned to appear for jury service.

(b) On receiving the notice from the judge, the clerk shall immediately write on the jury list the date that the prospective jurors are to be summoned to appear and shall either:

(1) summon the prospective jurors directly in the same manner a sheriff or constable would summon a juror under Section 62.013; or

(2) deliver the jury list to:

(A) the sheriff, for a county or district court jury; or

(B) the sheriff or constable, for a justice court jury.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 424, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.006, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0125. SUMMONS FOR JURY SERVICE ON GENERAL ELECTION DAY PROHIBITED. Prospective jurors may not be summoned to appear for jury service on the date of the general election for state and county officers.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 398, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 62.013. SUMMONS FOR JURY SERVICE BY CLERK, SHERIFF, OR CONSTABLE. (a) Except as provided by Section 62.014, the clerk, sheriff, or constable, on receipt of a jury list from a county or district clerk, shall immediately notify the persons whose names are on the list to appear for jury service on the date designated by the judge.

(b) The clerk, sheriff, or constable shall notify each prospective juror to appear for jury service:

(1) by an oral summons; or

(2) if the judge ordering the summons so directs, by a written summons sent by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, or by first class mail to the address on the jury wheel card or the address on the current voter registration list of the county.

(c) Delivery of a written summons is sufficient if the mail containing the summons is received by a person authorized by the United States Postal Service to receive it.

(d) The content of an oral or written summons to appear for jury service is sufficient if it includes the time and place for the appearance of the prospective juror for jury service, the purpose for which he is to appear, and the penalty for his failure to appear as required.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 424, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.007, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.008, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0131. FORM OF WRITTEN JURY SUMMONS. (a) The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall develop and maintain a model for a uniform written jury summons in this state.

(b) The model must include:

(1) the option to provide:

(A) the exemptions and restrictions governing jury service under Subchapter B; or

(B) the electronic address of the court's Internet website on which is posted the exemptions and restrictions governing jury service under Subchapter B;

(2) the information under Chapter 122, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, relating to the duties of an employer with regard to an employee who is summoned for jury service;

(3) notice of the contempt action to which the person summoned for jury service is subject under Section 62.0141 for failure to comply with the jury summons; and

(4) the option to:

(A) include in the jury summons the juror questionnaire required by Section 62.0132;

(B) provide the electronic address of the court's Internet website from which the juror questionnaire may be easily printed; or

(C) in counties in which the district and criminal district judges adopted a plan for an electronic jury selection method under Section 62.011, provide the electronic address of the court's Internet website for the prospective juror to access and complete the juror questionnaire.

(c) A written jury summons must conform with the model established under this section and must be 3-1/2 by 5 inches or larger in size.

(d) In developing and maintaining the model required by this section, the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall solicit and consider the opinions of the members of the judiciary, district clerks, and attorneys.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 539, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.009, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0132. JUROR QUESTIONNAIRE. (a) The Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall develop and maintain a questionnaire to accompany a written jury summons.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.027, eff. September 1, 2023.

(c) The questionnaire must require a person to provide biographical and demographic information that is relevant to service as a jury member, including the person's:

(1) name, sex, race, and age;

(2) residence address and mailing address;

(3) education level, occupation, and place of employment;

(4) marital status and the name, occupation, and place of employment of the person's spouse;

(5) citizenship status and county of residence; and

(6) any electronic address.

(d) Except as provided by this subsection, a person who has received a jury summons shall complete and submit a juror questionnaire when the person reports for jury duty. If the district and criminal district judges of a county adopt a plan for an electronic jury selection method under Section 62.011, the county may allow a person to complete and submit a juror questionnaire on the court's Internet website as authorized under Section 62.0111(b)(5).

(e) In developing and maintaining the questionnaire required by this section, the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall solicit and consider the opinions of the members of the judiciary, district clerks, and attorneys.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (g), information contained in a completed questionnaire is confidential and is not subject to Chapter 552.

(g) The information contained in a completed questionnaire may be disclosed to:

(1) a judge assigned to hear a cause of action in which the respondent to the questionnaire is a potential juror;

(2) court personnel;

(3) a litigant and a litigant's attorney in a cause of action in which the respondent to the questionnaire is a potential juror; and

(4) other than information provided that is related to Section 62.102(8) or (9), the voter registrar of a county in connection with any matter of voter registration or the administration of elections.

(h) The questionnaire must notify a person that if the person states that the person is not a citizen, the person will no longer be eligible to vote if the person fails to provide proof of citizenship.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 539, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 683 (H.B. 174), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 22 (S.B. 259), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 713 (H.B. 4034), Sec. 8, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.010, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.011, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.027, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.014. SUMMONS FOR JURY SERVICE BY CLERKS, SHERIFFS, OR BAILIFFS. (a) In a county with at least nine district courts, the district judges may direct that prospective jurors be summoned for jury service by the clerk, the sheriff, or a bailiff, or an assistant or deputy bailiff, in charge of the central jury room and the general panel of the county.

(b) A summons under this section to appear for jury service may be made verbally in person, by registered mail, by ordinary mail, or by any other method as determined by the district judges of the county.

(c) Prospective jurors summoned under this section for service on the general jury panel serve as jurors in civil and criminal cases, and additional summons for service in criminal cases is not required.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.012, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.013, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0141. FAILURE TO ANSWER JURY SUMMONS. In addition to any criminal penalty prescribed by law, a person summoned for jury service who does not comply with the summons as required by law or who knowingly provides false information in a request for an exemption or to be excused from jury service is subject to a contempt action punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1360 (S.B. 1704), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 62.0142. NOTICE ON WRITTEN SUMMONS. If a written summons for jury duty allows a person to claim a disqualification or exemption by signing a statement and returning it to the clerk of the court, the form must notify the person that by claiming a disqualification or exemption based on:

(1) the lack of citizenship, the person will no longer be eligible to vote if the person fails to provide proof of citizenship; or

(2) lack of residence in the county, the person might no longer be eligible to vote in the county.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 559 (H.B. 1271), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 683 (H.B. 174), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 62.0143. POSTPONEMENT OF JURY SERVICE. (a) A person summoned for jury service may request a postponement of the person's initial appearance for jury service. The person may request the postponement by contacting the clerk of the court in person, in writing, or by telephone before the date on which the person is summoned to appear.

(b) On receipt of a request under Subsection (a), the clerk of the court shall grant the person a postponement if:

(1) the person has not been granted a postponement in that county during the one-year period preceding the date on which the person is summoned to appear; and

(2) the person and the clerk determine a substitute date on which the person will appear for jury service that is not later than six months after the date on which the person was originally summoned to appear.

(c) A person who receives a postponement under Subsection (b) may request a subsequent postponement in the manner described by Subsection (a). The clerk of the court may approve the subsequent postponement only because of an extreme emergency that could not have been anticipated, such as a death in the person's family, sudden serious illness suffered by the person, or a natural disaster or national emergency in which the person is personally involved. Before the clerk may grant the subsequent postponement, the person and the clerk must determine a substitute date on which the person will appear for jury service that is not later than six months after the date on which the person was to appear after the postponement under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1360 (S.B. 1704), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 62.0142 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(26), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 62.0144. POSTPONEMENT OF JURY SERVICE IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a county:

(1) with a population of 1.4 million or more; and

(2) that has within its boundaries at least two municipalities that each have a population of 300,000 or more.

(b) A person summoned for jury service may request a postponement of the person's initial appearance for jury service. The person may request the postponement by contacting the clerk of the court, or the court's designee, in person, in writing, or by telephone before the date on which the person is summoned to appear.

(c) On receipt of a request under Subsection (b), the clerk of the court or the court's designee shall grant the person a postponement if:

(1) the person has not been granted a postponement in that county since the date on which the jury wheel from which the person was selected to appear was most recently reconstituted; and

(2) the person and the clerk or the court's designee determine a substitute date on which the person will appear for jury service that is not later than six months after the date on which the person was originally summoned to appear.

(d) A person who receives a postponement under Subsection (c) may request subsequent postponements in the manner described by Subsection (b). The clerk of the court or the court's designee may approve a subsequent postponement if the clerk or the court's designee determines that the person has a legitimate reason for requesting the postponement. Before the clerk or the court's designee may grant the subsequent postponement, the person and the clerk or the court's designee must determine a substitute date on which the person will appear for jury service that is not later than six months after the date on which the person was to appear after the later of:

(1) the postponement under Subsection (c); or

(2) the most recent postponement granted under this subsection.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 140 (S.B. 399), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 62.0145. REMOVAL OF CERTAIN PERSONS FROM POOL OF PROSPECTIVE JURORS. Except as provided by Section 62.0146, if a written summons for jury service sent by a clerk, sheriff, constable, or bailiff is undeliverable, the county or district clerk may remove from the jury wheel the jury wheel card for the person summoned or the district clerk, or in a county with a population of at least 1.7 million and in which more than 70 percent of the population resides in a single municipality, a bailiff appointed as provided under Section 62.019, may remove the person's name from the record of names for selection of persons for jury service under Section 62.011.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 777, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 571, Sec. 2, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 609 (S.B. 681), Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 40, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.014, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0146. UPDATING ADDRESSES OF CERTAIN PERSONS IN POOL OF PROSPECTIVE JURORS. If a written summons for jury service sent by a clerk, sheriff, constable, or bailiff is returned with a notation from the United States Postal Service of a change of address for the person summoned, the county or district clerk may update the jury wheel card to reflect the person's new address.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 571, Sec. 3, eff. June 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.015, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0147. MEANS OF POSTPONEMENT OF JURY SERVICE IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a county that has:

(1) a council of judges composed of the judges of the district courts and county courts at law; and

(2) a designated jury duty court that addresses administrative matters related to jury service paid for by the county.

(b) A person summoned for jury service may request a postponement of the person's initial appearance for jury service. The person may request the postponement by contacting the council of judges' designee, in person, in writing, or by telephone before the date on which the person is summoned to appear.

(c) On receipt of a request under Subsection (b), the council of judges' designee shall grant the person a postponement if:

(1) the person has not been granted a postponement in that county since the date on which the jury wheel from which the person was selected to appear was most recently reconstituted; and

(2) the designee and the person determine a substitute date on which the person will appear for jury service that is not later than six months after the date on which the person was originally summoned to appear.

(d) A person who is granted a postponement under Subsection (c) may request additional postponements in the manner described by Subsection (b). The council of judges' designee may grant an additional postponement if the designee and the person determine that the person has a legitimate reason for the postponement. Before the designee may grant the additional postponement, the designee and the person must determine a date on which the person will appear for jury service that is not later than six months after the date on which the person was to appear after the later of the date of:

(1) a postponement under Subsection (c); or

(2) the last postponement granted under this subsection.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 89 (S.B. 1195), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 62.015. SELECTION OF JURY PANEL. (a) On the day that jurors appear for jury service in a justice, county, or district court, the judge, if jury trials have been set, shall select from the names on the jury lists a sufficient number of qualified jurors to serve on the jury panel.

(b) If the court at any time does not have a sufficient number of prospective jurors present whose names are on the jury lists and who are not excused by the judge from jury service, the judge shall order the clerk, sheriff, or constable to summon additional prospective jurors to provide the requisite number of jurors for the panel. The names of additional jurors to be summoned by the clerk, sheriff, or constable to fill a jury panel shall be drawn from the jury wheel under orders of the judge. Additional jurors summoned to fill a jury panel shall be discharged when their services are no longer required.

(c) The judge may order all or part of a panel of jurors to stand adjourned from jury service until a subsequent date in the term, but a juror may not be paid for the time that he stands adjourned from jury service.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 36, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.016, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.016. INTERCHANGEABLE JURIES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) In each county with at least three district or criminal district courts, the district judges shall meet and determine the approximate number of prospective jurors that are reasonably necessary for each week of the year for a general panel of jurors for service in the county court, the justice courts, and all district and statutory county courts of the county. A majority of the district judges may act to carry out the provisions of this section.

(b) The district judges shall order that the number of names of prospective jurors that they determine are reasonably necessary for each week's general panel be drawn from the jury wheel. They shall order the drawing of names of prospective jurors for as many weeks in advance as they consider proper and may increase or decrease the number of names drawn for any week.

(c) The district judges shall designate from time to time a judge to whom the general panels report for jury service. The judge for the designated period shall organize, control, and supervise the members of the general jury panel.

(d) The clerk or sheriff shall notify the persons whose names are drawn from the jury wheel to appear before the designated judge for jury service. The judge shall hear the excuses of the prospective jurors and swear them in for jury service for the week for which they are to serve as jurors.

(e) When impaneled, the prospective jurors constitute a general jury panel for service as jurors in all justice, county, and district courts in the county and shall be used interchangeably in all of those courts. A county may summon jurors chosen for service under this section to the justice court in the manner prescribed by Section 62.412.

(f) In the event of a deficiency of jurors to satisfy the jury requirements of the justice, county, and district courts, the judge having control of the general jury panel shall order a sufficient number of additional names drawn to meet the emergency. The names of additional jurors for the general panel must be drawn from the jury wheel except as provided by Section 62.011. The additional jurors act only as special jurors and shall be discharged as soon as their services are no longer required.

(g) If it becomes necessary to reduce the number of persons on the general panel for the week of its selection because of a lack of work in a court or for other cause, the judge having control of the general jury panel shall cause the clerk to draw from the general panel the number of names that the judge determines is required for the week. The prospective jurors whose names are drawn shall continue to serve on the general panel for the remainder of the week, and the others are excused.

(h) In a county with a population of more than 1.5 million, the district judges, by a majority vote, may authorize the drawing of two general jury panels for the week, with one to be used in the courts that have a criminal docket and the other to be used in the courts that have a civil docket.

(i) Except as modified by this section and Section 62.011, the law governing jury wheels applies in the counties that use general jury panels interchangeably in their county and district courts.

(j) This section does not apply to a selection of jurors in a capital case or a mental health proceeding.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.80(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.017, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.017. INTERCHANGEABLE JURORS IN CERTAIN OTHER COUNTIES. (a) In a county with two district courts, the judges of the two courts may meet at a time fixed by them and determine the approximate number of prospective jurors that are reasonably necessary for each week of the year for a general panel of jurors for service in both district courts. The judges shall act together to carry out the provisions of this section.

(b) The district judges may order that the number of names of prospective jurors that they determine is reasonably necessary for each week's general panel be drawn from the jury wheel. They may order the drawing of names of prospective jurors for as many weeks in advance as they consider proper and may increase or decrease the number of names drawn for any week.

(c) The district judges shall designate from time to time the judge to whom the general panels report for jury service. The judge for the designated period shall organize, control, and supervise the members of the general jury panel.

(d) The clerk or sheriff shall notify the persons whose names are drawn from the jury wheel to appear before the designated judge for jury service. The judge shall hear the excuses of the prospective jurors and swear them in for jury service for the week for which they are to serve as jurors.

(e) When impaneled, the prospective jurors constitute a general jury panel for service as jurors in both district courts in the county and shall be used interchangeably in those courts. With the approval of both district judges, prospective jurors impaneled under this section may constitute a general jury panel for service as jurors in the justice courts, the county court, and all statutory county courts in the county, in addition to service as jurors in both district courts, and in that event, shall be used interchangeably in all district, justice, and county courts.

(f) In the event of a deficiency of jurors to satisfy the jury requirements of any of the courts, the judge having control of the general jury panel shall order sufficient additional names drawn to meet the emergency. The names of additional jurors for the general panel must be drawn from the jury wheel except as provided by Section 62.011. The additional jurors act only as special jurors and shall be discharged as soon as their services are no longer required.

(g) If it becomes necessary to reduce the number of persons on the general panel for the week of its selection because of a lack of work in a court or for other cause, the judge having control of the general jury panel shall cause the clerk to draw from the general panel the number of names that the judge determines is required for the week. The prospective jurors whose names are drawn shall continue to serve on the general panel for the remainder of the week, and the others are excused.

(h) Except as modified by this section and Section 62.011, the law governing jury wheels applies in the counties that use general jury panels interchangeably in their courts.

(i) This section does not apply to a selection of jurors in a capital case or a mental health commitment.

(j) The method for interchangeable jury panels authorized by this section is in addition to the other methods authorized by this subchapter. The adoption of the method provided by this section is in the discretion of the district judges of the counties with two district courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 7, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.018, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.0175. INTERCHANGEABLE JURORS IN COUNTIES WITH A SINGLE DISTRICT COURT AND A SINGLE COUNTY COURT AT LAW WITH CONCURRENT JURISDICTION. (a) In a county with only one district court and only one county court at law that has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in any matter, the judges of the two courts may meet at a time set by them and determine the approximate number of prospective jurors that are reasonably necessary for each week of the year for a general panel of jurors for service in both courts. The judges shall act together to carry out the provisions of this section.

(b) The judges may order that the number of names of prospective jurors that they determine is reasonably necessary for each week's general panel be drawn from the jury wheel. They may order the drawing of names of prospective jurors for as many weeks in advance as they consider proper and may increase or decrease the number of names drawn for any week.

(c) A general panel shall report to the district judge for jury service, and the district judge shall organize, control, and supervise the members of the general panel.

(d) The clerk or sheriff shall notify the persons whose names are drawn from the jury wheel to appear before the district judge for jury service. The judge shall hear the excuses of the prospective jurors and swear them in for jury service for the week for which they are to serve as jurors.

(e) When impaneled, the prospective jurors constitute a general panel for service as jurors in both courts and shall be used interchangeably in those courts. With the approval of both judges, prospective jurors impaneled under this section may constitute a general panel for service as jurors in the justice courts, the county court, and all other county courts at law in the county, in addition to service as jurors in the district court and the county court at law that has concurrent jurisdiction. In that event, the general panel shall be used interchangeably in the district court, county court, county courts at law, and justice courts.

(f) In the event of a deficiency of jurors to satisfy the jury requirements of any of the courts, the district judge shall order sufficient additional names drawn to meet the emergency. The names of additional jurors for the general panel must be drawn from the jury wheel except as provided by Section 62.011. The additional jurors act only as special jurors and shall be discharged as soon as their services are no longer required.

(g) If it becomes necessary to reduce the number of persons on the general panel for the week of its selection because of a lack of work in a court or for other cause, the district judge shall cause the clerk to draw from the general panel the number of names that the judge determines is required for the week. The prospective jurors whose names are drawn shall continue to serve on the general panel for the remainder of the week, and the others are excused.

(h) Except as modified by this section and Section 62.011, the law governing jury wheels applies in the counties that use general panels interchangeably in their courts.

(i) This section does not apply to a selection of jurors in a capital case or a mental health commitment.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1114 (H.B. 2414), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.019, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.018. QUARTERS FOR GENERAL PANELS. (a) The commissioners court of a county that uses an interchangeable general jury panel shall provide a comfortable place in or near the county courthouse for the use and convenience of the persons on the panel.

(b) The persons on the panel shall stay in or conveniently near the place provided for them when not in service so that they are at all times subject to service in a court as provided by this subchapter without delaying the proceedings of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.019. BAILIFFS FOR GENERAL PANELS. (a) Except as provided by this section, the sheriff of a county that uses an interchangeable general jury panel shall assign one of his deputies to take care of the persons on the panel, provide for their wants, and call them as their services are required by the judges of the courts using the interchangeable jury panel. The assigned deputy has general control of the persons on the panel when they are not in actual service as jurors.

(b) In a county with at least nine district courts, a majority of the district judges, with the approval of the commissioners court, may appoint a bailiff, and the assistant or deputy bailiffs that the judges consider necessary, to be in charge of the central jury room and the general panel. If the district judges in such a county appoint a bailiff and the necessary assistant or deputy bailiffs, the sheriff may not assign a deputy to the central jury room and the general panel. If the district judges do not appoint a bailiff to be in charge of the central jury room and the general panel, the sheriff shall perform the duties in connection with the jury room and general panel as provided by law.

(c) A bailiff or assistant or deputy bailiff appointed by the district judges serves a two-year term beginning January 1 of each odd-numbered year. The salary of each is set by the commissioners court on the recommendation of the district judges.

(d) The bailiffs and assistant and deputy bailiffs appointed by the district judges shall take care of the general panel and perform the duties in connection with the supervision of the central jury room and the general panel that are required by the district judges. They may notify prospective jurors whose names are drawn from the jury wheel or selected by other means provided by law to appear for jury service and may serve notices on absent jurors as directed by the district judge having control of the general jury panel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.020. ALTERNATE JURORS. (a) In district court, the judge may direct that not more than four jurors in addition to the regular jury be called and impaneled to sit as alternate jurors.

(b) In county court, the judge may direct that not more than two jurors in addition to the regular jury be called and impaneled to sit as alternate jurors.

(c) Alternate jurors shall be drawn and selected in the same manner as regular jurors. An alternate juror must meet the same qualifications, is subject to the same examination and challenges, shall take the same oath, has the same functions, powers, and privileges, and shall be accorded the same facilities and security as a regular juror.

(d) In the order in which they are called, alternate jurors shall replace jurors who, prior to the time the jury retires to consider its verdict, become or are found to be unable or disqualified to perform their duties. An alternate juror who does not replace a regular juror shall be discharged after the jury retires to consider its verdict.

(e) Each side is entitled to one peremptory challenge in addition to those otherwise allowed by law or by rule if one or two alternate jurors are to be impaneled. Each side is entitled to two peremptory challenges in addition to those otherwise allowed by law or by rule if three or four alternate jurors are to be impaneled. The additional peremptory challenges may be used against an alternate juror only, and the other peremptory challenges allowed by law or by rule may not be used against an alternate juror.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.021. DISMISSAL OF JUROR REMOVED FROM PANEL. In a county with a population of 2.5 million or more, a prospective juror removed from a jury panel for cause, by peremptory challenge or for any other reason, must be dismissed from jury service. After dismissal, the person may not be placed on another jury panel until the person's name is returned to the jury wheel and drawn again for jury service.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 70, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. JUROR QUALIFICATIONS

Sec. 62.101. JURY SERVICE. All individuals are competent petit jurors unless disqualified under this subchapter and are liable for jury service except as otherwise provided by this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.102. GENERAL QUALIFICATIONS FOR JURY SERVICE. A person is disqualified to serve as a petit juror unless the person:

(1) is at least 18 years of age;

(2) is a citizen of the United States;

(3) is a resident of this state and of the county in which the person is to serve as a juror;

(4) is qualified under the constitution and laws to vote in the county in which the person is to serve as a juror;

(5) is of sound mind and good moral character;

(6) is able to read and write;

(7) has not served as a petit juror for six days during the preceding three months in the county court or during the preceding six months in the district court;

(8) has not been convicted of misdemeanor theft or a felony; and

(9) is not under indictment or other legal accusation for misdemeanor theft or a felony.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 801 (S.B. 451), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 568 (H.B. 2747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 62.103. SUSPENSION OF GENERAL QUALIFICATIONS. (a) A court may suspend the qualification for jury service that requires a person to be able to read and write if it appears to the court that the requisite number of jurors able to read and write cannot be found in the county.

(b) A court may suspend the qualification for jury service that requires a person to have less than six days of service as a petit juror during the preceding three months in the county court or during the preceding six months in the district court if it appears to the court that the county's sparse population makes its enforcement seriously inconvenient.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.1031. FAILURE TO REGISTER TO VOTE. Failure to register to vote does not disqualify a person from jury service.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 62.104. DISQUALIFICATION FOR LEGAL BLINDNESS. (a) A person who is legally blind is not disqualified to serve as a juror in a civil case solely because of his legal blindness except as provided by this section.

(b) A legally blind person is disqualified to serve as a juror in a civil case if, in the opinion of the court, his blindness renders him unfit to serve as a juror in that particular case.

(c) In this section, "legally blind" means having:

(1) no more than 20/200 of visual acuity in the better eye with correcting lenses; or

(2) visual acuity greater than 20/200, but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.1041. DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING JUROR. (a) A deaf or hard of hearing person is not disqualified to serve as a juror solely because of hearing loss except as provided by this section.

(b) A deaf or hard of hearing person is disqualified to serve as a juror if, in the opinion of the court, his hearing loss renders him unfit to serve as a juror in that particular case.

(c) A deaf or hard of hearing person serving as a juror shall be reasonably accommodated in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.). An interpreter who is assisting a deaf or hard of hearing person serving as a juror may accompany the juror during all proceedings and deliberations in the case.

(d) If an interpreter is provided to a deaf or hard of hearing person serving as a juror in a district, county, or justice court, the county shall pay the cost of obtaining those services.

(e) A deaf or hard of hearing juror may request an auxiliary aid or service for a municipal court proceeding. The city shall honor the request unless the city can demonstrate that another effective means of communication exists. The city shall pay the cost unless the auxiliary aid or service will result in a fundamental alteration of the municipal court proceeding or in undue financial or administrative burdens.

(f) In this section, "deaf or hard of hearing" means having a hearing impairment, regardless of the existence of a speech impairment, that inhibits comprehension of an examination or proceeding or communication with others.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 550, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 271, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 62.105. DISQUALIFICATION FOR PARTICULAR JURY. A person is disqualified to serve as a petit juror in a particular case if he:

(1) is a witness in the case;

(2) is interested, directly or indirectly, in the subject matter of the case;

(3) is related by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree, as determined under Chapter 573, to a party in the case;

(4) has a bias or prejudice in favor of or against a party in the case; or

(5) has served as a petit juror in a former trial of the same case or in another case involving the same questions of fact.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.81, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 23, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(28), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 62.106. EXEMPTION FROM JURY SERVICE. (a) A person qualified to serve as a petit juror may establish an exemption from jury service if the person:

(1) is over 75 years of age;

(2) has legal custody of a child younger than 12 years of age and the person's service on the jury requires leaving the child without adequate supervision;

(3) is a student of a public or private secondary school;

(4) is a person enrolled and in actual attendance at an institution of higher education;

(5) is an officer or an employee of the senate, the house of representatives, or any department, commission, board, office, or other agency in the legislative branch of state government;

(6) is summoned for service in a county with a population of at least 200,000, unless that county uses a jury plan under Section 62.011 and the period authorized under Section 62.011(b)(5) exceeds two years, and the person has served as a petit juror in the county during the 24-month period preceding the date the person is to appear for jury service;

(7) is the primary caretaker of a person who is unable to care for himself or herself;

(8) except as provided by Subsection (b), is summoned for service in a county with a population of at least 250,000 and the person has served as a petit juror in the county during the three-year period preceding the date the person is to appear for jury service; or

(9) is a member of the United States military forces serving on active duty and deployed to a location away from the person's home station and out of the person's county of residence.

(b) Subsection (a)(8) does not apply if the jury wheel in the county has been reconstituted after the date the person served as a petit juror.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 733, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 798, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.35, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 9.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 686, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 153, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 599 (H.B. 319), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1022 (H.B. 2717), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1010 (H.B. 866), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 185 (H.B. 2015), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.020, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.107. PROCEDURES FOR ESTABLISHING EXEMPTIONS. (a) A person who is notified to appear for jury service may establish an exemption from the service under Section 62.106 without appearing in person by filing a signed statement of the ground of his exemption with the clerk of the court before the date on which he is summoned to appear.

(b) A person may also claim an exemption from jury service under Section 62.106 by filing with the sheriff, voter registrar, or district or county clerk of the county of the person's residence a sworn statement that sets forth the ground of and claims the exemption. The name of a person who claims an exemption by filing the sworn statement may not be placed in the jury wheel for the ensuing year.

(c) A person who files a statement with a clerk of the court, as provided by Subsection (a), claiming an exemption because the person is over 75 years of age, may also claim the permanent exemption on that ground authorized by Section 62.108 by including in the statement filed with the clerk a declaration that the person desires the permanent exemption. Promptly after a statement claiming a permanent exemption on the basis of age is filed, the clerk of the court with whom it is filed shall have a copy delivered to the voter registrar of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 686, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 85), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 185 (H.B. 2015), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.021, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.108. PERMANENT EXEMPTION FOR ELDERLY. (a) A person who is entitled to exemption from jury service because the person is over 75 years of age may establish a permanent exemption on that ground as provided by this section or Section 62.107.

(b) A person may claim a permanent exemption:

(1) by filing with the voter registrar of the county, by mail or personal delivery, a signed statement affirming that the person is over 75 years of age and desires a permanent exemption on that ground; or

(2) in the manner provided by Section 62.107(c).

(c) The voter registrar of the county shall maintain a current register indicating the name of each person who has claimed and is entitled to a permanent exemption from jury service because the person is over 75 years of age.

(d) The name of a person on the register of persons permanently exempt from jury service may not be placed in the jury wheel or otherwise used in preparing the record of names from which a jury is selected.

(e) A person who has claimed a permanent exemption from jury service because the person is over 75 years of age may rescind the exemption at any time by filing a signed request for the rescission with the voter registrar of the county. Rescission of a permanent exemption does not affect the right of a person who is over 75 years of age to claim permanent exemption at a later time.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 686, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 85), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 185 (H.B. 2015), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.022, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.109. EXEMPTION FOR PHYSICAL OR MENTAL IMPAIRMENT OR INABILITY TO COMPREHEND ENGLISH. (a) The judge of a district court by order may permanently or for a specified period exempt from service as a juror in all the county and district courts in the county a person with a physical or mental impairment or with an inability to comprehend or communicate in the English language that makes it impossible or very difficult for the person to serve on a jury.

(b) A person requesting an exemption under this section must submit to the court an affidavit stating the person's name and address and the reason for and the duration of the requested exemption. A person requesting an exemption due to a physical or mental impairment must attach to the affidavit a statement from a physician. The affidavit and physician's statement may be submitted to the court at the time the person is summoned for jury service or at any other time.

(c) The clerk of the district court shall promptly notify the voter registrar of the county of the name and address of each person permanently exempted. The voter registrar shall maintain a current register showing the name and address of each person permanently exempt from jury service under this section.

(d) A person listed on the register may not be summoned for jury service during the period for which the person is exempt. The name of a person listed on the register may not be placed in the jury wheel or otherwise used in preparing the record of names from which a jury list is selected during the period for which the person is exempt.

(e) A person exempt from jury service under this section may rescind the exemption at any time by filing a signed request for the rescission with the voter registrar of the county.

(f) An affidavit accompanying a request for an exemption from jury service because of a physical or mental impairment may be presented by the affiant or by a friend or relative of the affiant. The affidavit must state:

(1) the name and address of the physician whose statement accompanies the affidavit;

(2) whether the request is for a permanent or temporary exemption;

(3) the period of time for which a temporary exemption is requested; and

(4) that as a direct result of the physical or mental impairment it is impossible or very difficult for the affiant to serve on a jury.

(g) An affidavit accompanying a request for an exemption from jury service because of an inability to comprehend or communicate in the English language must be presented by the affiant in person. The affidavit must:

(1) be sworn to by the affiant in person before the district clerk or a deputy district clerk; and

(2) be subscribed with a statement by a third party that the affidavit was read to the affiant before signing and that the affiant stated that it was his request to be permanently exempted from jury service in the county.

(h) The name and address of a person exempted from jury service under this section shall be added to or deleted from the list or register at any time permitted by law and when the names and addresses of eligible jurors are regularly deleted or added to the list or register.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 85), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.023, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.110. JUDICIAL EXCUSE OF JUROR. (a) Except as provided by this section, a court may hear any reasonable sworn excuse of a prospective juror, including any claim of an exemption or a lack of qualification, and if the excuse is considered sufficient shall release him from jury service entirely or until another day of the term, as appropriate.

(b) Pursuant to a plan approved by the commissioners court of the county in the same manner as a plan is approved for jury selection under Section 62.011, the court's designee may:

(1) hear any reasonable excuse of a prospective juror, including any claim of an exemption or a lack of qualification; and

(2) discharge the juror or release him from jury service until a specified day of the term, as appropriate, if:

(A) the excuse is considered sufficient; and

(B) the juror submits to the court's designee a statement of the ground of the exemption or lack of qualification or other excuse.

(c) The court or the court's designee as provided by this section may not excuse a prospective juror for an economic reason unless each party of record is present and approves the release of the juror for that reason.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 589, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 43, Sec. 4, eff. Oct. 20, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 905 (H.B. 75), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 62.111. PENALTY FOR DEFAULTING JURORS. A juror lawfully notified shall be fined not less than $100 nor more than $500 if the juror:

(1) fails to attend court in obedience to the notice without reasonable excuse; or

(2) files a false claim of exemption from jury service.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 640 (H.B. 1665), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 62.112. EXCUSE OF JUROR FOR RELIGIOUS HOLY DAY. (a) In this section:

(1) "Religious organization" means an organization that meets the standards for qualification as a religious organization under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

(2) "Religious holy day" means a day on which the tenets of a religious organization prohibit its members from participating in secular activities, such as court proceedings.

(b) If a prospective juror is required to appear at a court proceeding on a religious holy day observed by the prospective juror, the court or the court's designee shall release the prospective juror from jury service entirely or until another day of the term. If the court determines that a term of a court proceeding may extend to cover a day on which a religious holy day is observed by the prospective juror, the court or the court's designee shall release the prospective juror from jury service entirely or until another day of the term.

(c) A prospective juror who seeks to be released from jury service may be required to file with the court an affidavit stating:

(1) the grounds for the release; and

(2) that the juror holds religious beliefs that prohibit him from taking part in a court proceeding on the day for which the release from jury duty is sought.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 589, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 825, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 62.113. COMPILATION OF LIST OF NONCITIZENS. (a) The clerk of the court shall maintain a list of the name and address of each person who is excused or disqualified under this subchapter from jury service because the person is not a citizen of the United States.

(b) On the third business day of each month, the clerk shall send a copy of the list of persons excused or disqualified because of citizenship in the previous month to:

(1) the voter registrar of the county;

(2) the secretary of state; and

(3) the county or district attorney for an investigation of whether the person committed an offense under Section 13.007, Election Code, or other law.

(c) A list compiled under this section may not be used for a purpose other than a purpose described by Subsection (b) or Section 16.0332 or 18.068, Election Code.

(d) A person commits an offense if the person violates Subsection (c). An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(e) The information required to be filed with the secretary of state under this section must be filed electronically. The secretary of state may waive this requirement on application for a waiver submitted by the clerk.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 683 (H.B. 174), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.10, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 62.114. COMPILATION OF LIST OF NONRESIDENTS. (a) The clerk of the court shall maintain a list containing the name and address of each person who is excused or disqualified under this subchapter from jury service because the person is not a resident of the county.

(b) On the third business day of each month, the clerk shall send a copy of the list of persons excused or disqualified in the previous month because the persons do not reside in the county to:

(1) the voter registrar of the county; and

(2) the secretary of state.

(c) A list compiled under this section may not be used for a purpose other than a purpose described by Subsection (b) or Section 15.081 or 18.068, Election Code.

(d) The voter registrar shall notify each person contained on a list sent to the registrar under Subsection (b) at the address shown on the person's jury summons that the person is being placed on the county's suspense list of registered voters because of the person's excuse or disqualification from jury service based on nonresidence in the county. The notice must include information describing how the person may be removed from the suspense list and restored to regular voter registration in the county.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 559 (H.B. 1271), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.11, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 62.115. COMPILATION OF LIST OF CONVICTED PERSONS. (a) The clerk of the court shall maintain a list of the name and address of each person who is disqualified under this subchapter from jury service because the person was convicted of misdemeanor theft or a felony.

(b) A person who was convicted of misdemeanor theft or a felony shall be permanently disqualified from serving as a juror. A person is exempt from this section if the person:

(1) was placed on deferred adjudication and received a dismissal and discharge in accordance with Article 42A.111, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) was placed on community supervision and the period of community supervision was terminated early under Article 42A.701, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(3) was pardoned or has had the person's civil rights restored.

(c) The district clerk may remove from the jury wheel the jury wheel card for the person whose name appears on the list.

(d) On the third business day of each month, the clerk shall send to the secretary of state a copy of the list of persons disqualified because of a conviction of misdemeanor theft or a felony in the preceding month.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.024, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. DISTRICT COURT JURIES

Sec. 62.201. NUMBER OF JURORS. The jury in a district court is composed of 12 persons, except that the parties may agree to try a particular case with fewer than 12 jurors.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 62.202. MEALS DURING JURY DELIBERATION. (a) In a county in which the commissioners court has approved payment by the county for meals for jurors who are serving on a jury in a civil case, a district judge may keep the jurors together for deliberation to expedite the final disposition of a civil case in the district court instead of dismissing the jurors for meals.

(b) The district judge may draw a warrant on the jury fund or other appropriate fund of the county in which the civil case is tried to cover the cost of buying and transporting the meals to the jury room. The judge may spend a reasonable amount per meal for a juror serving on a jury in a civil case.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 11.02, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. COUNTY COURT AND JUSTICE COURT JURIES

Sec. 62.301. NUMBER OF JURORS. The jury in the county courts and in the justice courts is composed of six persons except as provided by the constitution or other law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 424, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 696 (S.B. 2342), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2020.

Sec. 62.302. DRAWING NAMES FOR JURY SERVICE IN CERTAIN COUNTY COURTS. (a) The county judge or a judge of a county court at law may order the drawing of names from the jury wheel if the judge considers the number of prospective jurors already drawn to be insufficient or if an interchangeable general jury panel is not drawn as provided by Section 62.016, 62.017, or 62.0175.

(b) The prospective jurors whose names are drawn as provided by this section are available for service in the county court or county courts at law, as applicable, and for the period of time reasonably required for the trials in the applicable kind of court.

(c) The county judge and a judge of a county court at law concurrently have the same power to determine and remedy a deficiency in the number of prospective jurors as the district judge designated to control a general jury panel as provided by Section 62.016, 62.017, or 62.0175. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the applicable general provisions in Subchapter A that govern the drawing of names of prospective jurors by the district judge govern the drawing of names under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1114 (H.B. 2414), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER E. JUSTICE COURT JURIES

Sec. 62.411. JUSTICE COURT RULES. (a) In addition to other methods of jury selection provided by this chapter, a justice of the peace may issue a writ commanding the clerk, sheriff, or constable to immediately summon a venire from which six qualified persons may be selected for jury service if:

(1) a jury case is pending for trial at a term of justice court; or

(2) the court does not have a sufficient number of prospective jurors present whose names are on the jury list and who are not excused from jury service.

(b) Jurors who are empaneled shall remain in attendance in the court and, until discharged by the court, may serve as jurors in any case before the court.

(c) This section applies only in a county with a population of more than 2.8 million.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.025, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 62.412. SUMMONING PROSPECTIVE JURORS DIRECTLY TO JUSTICE COURT. (a) A county that uses interchangeable juries under Section 62.016 may summon a prospective juror to report directly to a justice court in the precinct in which that person resides.

(a-1) A county described by Subsection (a) with a population of 3.3 million or more may also summon a prospective juror to report directly to a justice court in the precinct adjacent to the precinct in which that person resides.

(b) The justice of the peace of the justice court to which prospective jurors are summoned for jury service under this section shall hear the excuses of the prospective jurors and swear them in for jury service.

(c) A justice of the peace may command the clerk, sheriff, or constable to immediately summon additional persons for jury service in the justice court if the number of qualified jurors, including persons summoned under Section 62.016, is less than the number necessary for the justice court to conduct its proceedings.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 141 (S.B. 1274), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 8.026, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER F. MUNICIPAL COURT JURIES

Sec. 62.501. QUALIFICATION. To be eligible to serve on a jury of a municipal court, including a municipal court of record, a person must be resident of the municipality for which the court is established.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.